Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6132.01
Name.

If the name of a mutual insurer reorganizing as a reorganized stock insurer pursuant to the Mutual Insurance Holding Company Act includes the word mutual, the reorganized stock insurer may continue to use the word mutual in its name if (1) the name includes a word or words that identify the reorganized stock insurer as a stock insurer and (2) the director finds that the continued use of the word mutual in its name is not likely to mislead or deceive the public.

Laws 1999, LB 259, § 14.